Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4982.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 34. (1) Except as provided otherwise provided in this section, an estate at will or by sufferance may be terminated by either party by giving 1 month's notice to the other party. If the rent reserved in a lease is payable at periods of less than 3 months, the time of notice is sufficient if it is equal to the interval between the times of payment. Notice is not void because it states a day for the termination of the tenancy that does not correspond to the conclusion or commencement of a rental period. The notice terminates the tenancy at the end of a period equal in length to the interval between times of payment. (2) If a tenant neglects or refuses to pay rent on a lease at will or otherwise, the landlord may terminate the tenancy by giving the tenant a written 7-day 14-day notice to quit. (3) A tenancy from year to year may be terminated by either party by a notice to quit, given at any time to the other party. The notice shall terminate terminates the lease at the expiration of 1 year from the time of the service of the notice. (4) If a tenant holds over after a lease is terminated pursuant to a clause in the lease providing for termination because the tenant, a member of the tenant's household, or other person individual under the tenant's control has manufactured, delivered, possessed with intent to deliver, or possessed a controlled substance on the leased premises, the landlord may terminate the tenancy by giving the tenant a written 24-hour notice to quit. This subsection applies only if a formal police report has been filed alleging that the person individual has unlawfully manufactured, delivered, possessed with intent to deliver, or possessed a controlled substance on the leased premises. For purposes of this subsection, "controlled substance" means a substance or a counterfeit substance classified in schedule 1, 2, or 3 pursuant to under sections 7211 to 7216 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7211 to 333.7216.